Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201657-914
Temporary restraining order; bond; limitation of actions.

(1) No temporary restraining order or injunction of any kind against the commission or its agents, employees or representatives, or the Attorney General, shall become operative unless and until the plaintiff party shall execute and file with the clerk of the district court a bond in such amount and upon such conditions as the court issuing such order or injunction may direct, with surety approved by the clerk of the district court thereof. The bond shall be made payable to the State of Nebraska, and shall be for the use and benefit of all persons who may be and to the extent that they shall suffer injury or damage by any acts done under the protection of the restraining order or injunction, if the same should not have issued. No suit on the bond may be brought after six months from the date of the final determination of the suit in which the restraining order or injunction was issued.

(2) Any suit, action, or other proceedings based upon a violation of any of the provisions of sections 57-901 to 57-921 shall be commenced within one year from the date of the violation complained of.

Laws 1959, c. 262, § 14, p. 912;

Laws 2016, LB1082, § 7.
July 21, 2016